Missouri, session 2026, HB3293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 306.220, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 306.220, to read as follows:
306.220. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and referred to as
"Hannah's Law".
2. Each person under the age of [seven] twelve who is on board any watercraft which
is on the waters of this state or who is wading or swimming in navigable public waters
more than three feet in depth shall wear a personal flotation device which is approved by
the United States Coast Guard. Any person who allows a person under the age of [seven]
twelve to be on board any watercraft which is on the waters of this state without wearing a
personal flotation device, or to wade or swim in navigable public waters more than three
feet in depth without wearing a personal flotation device,shall be deemed guilty of a class
C misdemeanor. This section does not apply when the person under the age of [seven] twelve
is in a part of a watercraft which is fully enclosed, where such enclosure will prevent such
person from falling out of or being thrown from the watercraft. This section does not apply
when a person under the age of twelve is supervised by a lifeguard.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.